Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5910.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-20-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-20 entitled "Decisions,
Special Findings and Assessment of Damages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-20-4. Comparative negligence.
In all actions hereafter brought for personal injuries, or where personal injuries have
resulted in death, or for injury to property, the fact that the person injured, or the owner of the
property or person having control over the property, may not have been in the exercise of due care,
the fact that the person injured may have assumed the risk of injury and/or death, or the fact that
the danger or defect was open and obvious shall not bar a recovery, but damages shall be diminished
by the finder of fact in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to the person injured, or
the owner of the property or the person having control over the property.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002291
========